Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 5. Finance

§ 3441.
Form of contribution.

The contribution of a partner may be in cash, property, or services rendered, or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

1997, No. 149

, § 6 makes this section effective on January 1, 1999, and further provides that this section applies only to contributions and distributions made after January 1, 1999.

§ 3442.
Liability for contribution.

A promise by a limited partner to contribute to the limited partnership is not enforceable unless set out in a writing signed by the limited partner.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner is obligated to the limited partnership to perform any enforceable promise to contribute cash or property or to perform services, even if he or she is unable to perform because of death, disability, or any other reason. If a partner does not make the required contribution of property or services, he or she is obligated at the option of the limited partnership to contribute cash equal to that portion of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to section 3405 of this title, of the stated contribution which has not been made.

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, the obligation of a partner to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation of this chapter may be compromised only by consent of all partners. Notwithstanding the compromise, a creditor of a limited partnership who extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on that obligation after the partner signs a writing which reflects the obligation and before the amendment or cancellation thereof to reflect the compromise may enforce the original obligation.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

1997, No. 149

, § 6 makes this section effective on January 1, 1999, and further provides that this section applies only to contributions and distributions made after January 1, 1999.

§ 3443.
Sharing of profits and losses.

The profits and losses of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners, and among classes of partners, in the manner provided in writing in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not so provide in writing, profits and losses shall be allocated on the basis of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to section 3405 of this title, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the partnership and have not been returned.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3444.
Sharing of distributions.

Distributions of cash or other assets of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners and among classes of partners in the manner provided in writing in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not so provide in writing, distributions shall be made on the basis of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept pursuant to section 3405 of this title, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the partnership and have not been returned.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.